North Carolina statutes. Chapter 95. Department of Labor and Labor Regulations.
Article 2A. Wage and Hour Act.

§ 95-25.1.
Short title and legislative purpose.

This Article shall be known and may be cited as the “Wage and Hour Act.”

The public policy of this State is declared as follows: The wage levels of employees, hours of labor, payment of earned wages, and the well-being of minors are subjects of concern requiring legislation to promote the general welfare of the people of the State without jeopardizing the competitive position of North Carolina business and industry. The General Assembly declares that the general welfare of the State requires the enactment of this law under the police power of the State.

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-4, s. 1, effective March 30, 2017.

History.

1937, c. 409, s. 2; 1979, c. 839, s. 1; 2016-3, 2nd Ex. Sess., s. 2.1; 2017-4, s. 1.

§ 95-25.2.
Definitions.

In this Article, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agriculture” includes farming in all its branches performed by a farmer or on a farm as an incident to or in conjunction with farming operations.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Labor.

“Employ” means to suffer or permit to work.

“Employee” includes any individual employed by an employer.

“Employer” includes any person acting directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an employee.

“Establishment” means a physical location where business is conducted.

“The Fair Labor Standards Act” means the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended and as the same may be amended from time to time by the United States Congress.

“Hours worked” includes all time an employee is employed.

“Payday” means that day designated for payment of wages due by virtue of the employment relationship.

“Pay periods” may be daily, weekly, biweekly, semimonthly, or monthly.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, association, corporation, business trust, legal representative, or any organized group of persons. For the purposes of

G.S. 95-25.2

,

G.S. 95-25.3

,

G.S. 95-25.14

, and

G.S. 95-25.2

0, it also means the State of North Carolina, any city, town, county, or municipality, or any State or local agency or instrumentality of government. The Government of the United States and any agency of the United States (including the United States Postal Service and Postal Rate Commission) are not included as persons for any purpose under this Article.

“Seasonal food service establishment” means a restaurant, food and drink stand or other establishment generally recognized as a commercial food service establishment, preparing and serving food to the public but operating 180 days or less per year.

“Seasonal religious or nonprofit educational conference center or a seasonal amusement or recreational establishment” means an establishment which does not operate for more than seven months in any calendar year, or during the preceding calendar year had average receipts for any six months of such year of not more than thirty-three and one-third percent (331/3%) of its average receipts for the other six months of that year.

“Tipped employee” means any employee who customarily receives more than twenty dollars ($20.00) a month in tips.

“Tip” shall mean any money or part thereof over and above the actual amount due a business for goods, food, drink, services or articles sold which is paid in cash or by credit card, or is given to or left for an employee by a patron or patrons of the business where the employee is employed.

“Wage” paid to an employee means compensation for labor or services rendered by an employee whether determined on a time, task, piece, job, day, commission, or other basis of calculation, and the reasonable cost as determined by the Commissioner of furnishing employees with board, lodging, or other facilities. For the purposes of

G.S. 95-25.6

through

G.S. 95-25.13

“wage” includes sick pay, vacation pay, severance pay, commissions, bonuses, and other amounts promised when the employer has a policy or a practice of making such payments.

“Workweek” means any period of 168 consecutive hours.

“Enterprise” means the related activities performed either through unified operations or common control by any person or persons for a common business purpose and includes all such activities whether performed in one or more establishments or by one or more corporate units but shall not include the related activities performed for such enterprise by an independent contractor or franchisee.

History.

1959, c. 475; 1961, c. 652; 1969, c. 34, s. 2; c. 218; 1971, c. 1231, s. 1; 1975, c. 413, s. 1; c. 605; 1977, c. 653; c. 672, s. 1; c. 826, s. 1; 1979, c. 839, s. 1; 1981, c. 663, ss. 10, 11; 1983, c. 708, s. 3; 1991, c. 330, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “An Analysis of the Retaliatory Employment Discrimination Act and Protected Activity under the Occupational Safety and Health Act of North Carolina,” see 15 Campbell L. Rev. 29 (1992).

§ 95-25.3.
Minimum wage.

Every employer shall pay to each employee who in any workweek performs any work, wages of at least six dollars and fifteen cents ($6.15) per hour or the minimum wage set forth in paragraph 1 of section 6(a) of the Fair Labor Standards Act, 29 U.S.C. 206(a)(1), as that wage may change from time to time, whichever is higher, except as otherwise provided in this section.

In order to prevent curtailment of opportunities for employment, the wage rate for full-time students, learners, apprentices, and messengers, as defined under the Fair Labor Standards Act, shall be ninety percent (90%) of the rate in effect under subsection (a) above, rounded to the lowest nickel.

The Commissioner, in order to prevent curtailment of opportunities for employment, may, by regulation, establish a wage rate less than the wage rate in effect under section (a) which may apply to persons whose earning or productive capacity is impaired by age or physical or mental deficiency or injury, as such persons are defined under the Fair Labor Standards Act.

The Commissioner, in order to prevent curtailment of opportunities for employment of the economically disadvantaged and the unemployed, may, by regulation, establish a wage rate not less than eighty-five percent (85%) of the otherwise applicable wage rate in effect under subsection (a) which shall apply to all persons (i) who have been unemployed for at least 15 weeks and who are economically disadvantaged, or (ii) who are, or whose families are, receiving Work First Family Assistance or who are receiving supplemental security benefits under Title XVI of the Social Security Act.Pursuant to regulations issued by the Commissioner, certificates establishing eligibility for such subminimum wage shall be issued by the Division of Employment Security.The regulation issued by the Commissioner shall not permit employment at the subminimum rate for a period in excess of 52 weeks.

The Commissioner, in order to prevent curtailment of opportunities for employment, and to not adversely affect the viability of seasonal establishments, may, by regulation, establish a wage rate not less than eighty-five percent (85%) of the otherwise applicable wage rate in effect under subsection (a) that shall apply to any employee employed by an establishment that is a seasonal food service establishment.

Tips earned by a tipped employee may be counted as wages only up to the amount permitted in section 3(m) of the Fair Labor Standards Act, 29 U.S.C. 203(m), if the tipped employee is notified in advance, is permitted to retain all tips and the employer maintains accurate and complete records of tips received by each employee as such tips are certified by the employee monthly or for each pay period. Even if the employee refuses to certify tips accurately, tips may still be counted as wages when the employer complies with the other requirements of this section and can demonstrate by monitoring tips that the employee regularly receives tips in the amount for which the credit is taken. Tip pooling shall also be permissible among employees who customarily and regularly receive tips; however, no employee’s tips may be reduced by more than fifteen percent (15%) under a tip pooling arrangement.

Repealed by Session Laws 2006-259, s. 18, effective August 23, 2006.

History.

1959, c. 475; 1963, c. 816; 1965, c. 229; 1969, c. 34, s. 1; 1971, c. 138; 1973, c. 802; 1975, c. 256, s. 1; 1977, c. 519; 1979, c. 839, s. 1; 1981, c. 493, s. 1; c. 663, s. 13; 1983, c. 708, s. 1; 1985, c. 97; 1987, c. 79; 1991, c. 270, ss. 1, 2; c. 330, s. 5; 1997-146, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 12.25; 2006-114, s. 1; 2006-259, s. 18; 2011-401, s. 3.6; 2017-185, s. 3(b).

Cross References.

As to exemptions from the provisions of this section, see

G.S. 95-25.14

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-114, s. 1, effective January 1, 2007, in subsection (a), inserted “six dollars and fifteen cents ($6.15) per hour or” following “wages of at least” and inserted “whichever is higher” following “from time to time.”

Session Laws 2006-259, s. 18, effective August 23, 2006, repealed subsection (g) which read: “In order to prevent curtailment of opportunities for employment, an employer may, in lieu of the minimum wage prescribed by this section, pay a training wage to eligible persons in accordance with G.S.95-25.3A.”

Session Laws 2011-401, s. 3.6, effective November 1, 2011, substituted “Division of Employment Security” for “Employment Security Commission” in the second paragraph of subsection (d).

Session Laws 2017-185, s. 3(b), effective January 1, 2018, in subsection (e), substituted “that” for “which” twice, and deleted “a seasonal amusement or recreational establishment, or” preceding “a seasonal food.”

Legal Periodicals.

For 1997 legislative survey, see 20 Campbell L. Rev. 389 (1998).

§ 95-25.3A.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-308, s. 8, effective July 1, 2003.

§ 95-25.4.
Overtime.

Every employer shall pay each employee who works longer than 40 hours in any workweek at a rate of not less than time and one half of the regular rate of pay of the employee for those hours in excess of 40 per week.

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 330, s. 2, effective June 19, 1991.

History.

1973, c. 685, s. 1; 1979, c. 839, s. 1; 1991, c. 330, s. 2; c. 492, s. 1; 2017-185, s. 3(c).

Cross References.

As to exemptions from the provisions of this section, see

G.S. 95-25.14

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-185, s. 3(c), effective January 1, 2018, deleted “provided that employers of seasonal amusement or recreational establishment employees are required to pay those employees the overtime rate only for hours in excess of 45 per workweek” from the end of subsection (a).

§ 95-25.5.
Youth employment.

No youth under 18 years of age shall be employed by any employer in any occupation without a youth employment certificate unless specifically exempted. The Commissioner of Labor shall prescribe regulations for youths and employers concerning the issuance, maintenance and revocation of certificates. Certificates will be issued by the Commissioner.

(a1)

During the regular school term, no youth under 18 years of age who is enrolled in school in grade 12 or lower may be employed between 11 P.M. and 5 A.M. when there is school for the youth the next day. This restriction does not apply to youths 16 and 17 years of age if the employer receives written approval for the youth to work beyond the stated hours from the youth’s parent or guardian and from the youth’s principal or the principal’s designee.

No youth under 18 years of age may be employed by an employer in any occupation which the United States Department of Labor shall find and by order declare to be hazardous and without exemption under the Fair Labor Standards Act, or in any occupation which the Commissioner of Labor after public hearing shall find and declare to be detrimental to the health and well-being of youths.

No youth 14 or 15 years of age may be employed by an employer in any occupation except those determined by the United States Department of Labor to be permitted occupations under the Fair Labor Standards Act; provided, such youths may be employed by employers:

No more than three hours on a day when school is in session for the youth;

No more than eight hours on a day when school is not in session for the youth;

Only between 7 A.M. and 7 P.M., except to 9 P.M. during the summer (when school is not in session);

No more than 40 hours in any one week when school is not in session for the youth;

No more than 18 hours in any one week when school is in session for the youth; and

Only outside school hours.Notwithstanding the above, enrollees in high school apprenticeships or in work experience and career exploration programs as defined under the Fair Labor Standards Act may work up to 23 hours in any one week when school is in session, any portion of which may be during school hours.

No youth 13 years of age or less may be employed by an employer, except youths 12 and 13 years of age may be employed outside school hours in the distribution of newspapers to the consumer but not more than three hours per day. An employment certificate shall not be required for any youth under 18 years of age engaged in the distribution of newspapers to the consumer outside of school hours.

No youth under 16 years of age shall be employed for more than five consecutive hours without an interval of at least 30 minutes for rest. No period of less than 30 minutes shall be deemed to interrupt a continuous period of work.

For any youth 13 years of age or older, the Commissioner may waive any provision of this section and authorize the issuance of an employment certificate when:

He receives a letter from a social worker, court, probation officer, county department of social services, a letter from the North Carolina Alcohol Beverage Control Commission or school official stating those factors which create a hardship situation and how the best interest of the youth is served by allowing a waiver; and

He determines that the health or safety of the youth would not be adversely affected; and

The parent, guardian, or other person standing in loco parentis consents in writing to the proposed employment.

Youths employed as models, or as actors or performers in motion pictures or theatrical productions, or in radio or television productions are exempt from all provisions of this section except the certificate requirements of subsection (a).

Youths employed by an outdoor drama directly in production-related positions such as stagehands, lighting, costumes, properties and special effects are exempt from all provisions of this section except the certificate requirements of subsection (a). Positions such as office workers, ticket takers, ushers and parking lot attendants have no exemption and are subject to all provisions of this section.

Youth under 18 years of age employed by their parent, guardian, or other person standing in loco parentis are exempt from all provisions of this section, except for all of the following:

The certificate requirements of subsection (a) of this section.

The prohibition from hazardous or detrimental occupations of subsection (b) of this section.

The prohibitions of subsection (j)(2) of this section if the youths only work at the establishment when another employee at least 21 years of age is in charge of and present at the licensed premises.

No person who holds any ABC permit issued pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 18B of the General Statutes for the on-premises sale or consumption of alcoholic beverages, including any mixed beverages, shall employ a youth:

Under 16 years of age on the premises for any purpose, unless the youth is at least 14 years of age and each of the following conditions is met:

The person obtains the written consent of a parent or guardian of the youth.

The youth is employed to work on the outside grounds of the premises for a purpose that does not involve the preparation, serving, dispensing, or sale of alcoholic beverages.

Under 18 years of age to prepare, serve, dispense or sell any alcoholic beverages, including mixed beverages, except for sale of alcoholic beverages at the point-of-sale for only off-premises consumption.

Persons and establishments required to comply with or subject to regulation of child labor under the Fair Labor Standards Act are exempt from all provisions of this section, except the certificate requirements of subsection (a), the provisions of subsection (a1), the prohibition from occupations found and declared to be detrimental by the Commissioner of Labor pursuant to subsection (b), and the prohibitions of subsection (j). In addition, employment certificates will not be issued if such person’s employment will be in violation of the applicable child labor provisions of the Fair Labor Standards Act. Such employers may also be assessed civil penalties pursuant to

G.S. 95-25.23

for each violation of the provisions of this section or any regulation issued hereunder from which there is no exemption.

(k1)

Youth, who are at least 16 years of age but less than 18 years of age, who participate in a supervised, practice experience in an occupation with an employer are exempt from the prohibition from occupations found and declared to be detrimental to the health and well-being of youth by the Commissioner of Labor pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, if the Commissioner of Labor finds all of the following conditions are met:

The youth is enrolled in a public school or a nonpublic school that meets the requirements of Part 1 or Part 2 of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes that is partnering with the employer to offer the supervised, practice experience for the occupation.

The employer submits to the Commissioner of Labor the written agreement between the employer and the public or nonpublic school where the youth is enrolled that governs the operation of the supervised, practice experience for the occupation. The written agreement shall include at least the following:

The work is incidental to the youth’s supervised, practice experience for the occupation.

The work is intermittent and for short periods of time.

The work is performed under direct and close supervision of a qualified and experienced person.

The employer shall give safety instructions and training to the youth before performing the work.

The employer has prepared a schedule of organized and progressive work processes to be performed by the youth.The terms of the written agreement required by subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be consistent with the guidance provided in Child Labor Bulletin 101, Child Labor Provisions for Nonagricultural Occupations under the Fair Labor Standards Act, published by the United States Department of Labor, Wage and Hour Division, effective November 2016, and any subsequent revisions published for that document.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any youth who holds a North Carolina driver’s license valid for the type of driving involved may be assigned as part of his employment to drive an automobile or truck not exceeding 6,000 pounds gross vehicle weight within a 25-mile radius of the principal place of employment, provided that the youth has completed a State-approved driver-education course, and provided that the assignment does not involve the towing of vehicles. “Gross vehicle weight” includes the truck chassis with lubricants, water and full tank or tanks of fuel, plus the weight of the cab or driver’s compartment, body and special chassis and body equipment, and payload.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, youths who are enrolled at an institution of higher education may be employed by the institution provided the employment is not hazardous. As used in this subsection, “institution of higher education” means any constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, any North Carolina community college, or any college or university that awards postsecondary degrees.

Nothing in this section prohibits qualified youths under 18 years of age from participating in training through their fire department, the Office of State Fire Marshal, or the North Carolina Community College System. As used in this subsection, the term “qualified youth under 18 years of age” means an uncompensated fire department or rescue squad member who is at least the age of 15 and under the age of 18 and who is a member of a bona fide fire department, as that term is defined in

G.S. 58-86-25

, or of a rescue squad described in

G.S. 58-86-30

.

History.

1937, c. 317, ss. 1-3, 6, 9, 18; 1943, c. 670; 1951, c. 1187, s. 1; 1967, cc. 173, 764; 1969, c. 962; 1973, c. 649, s. 1; c. 758, s. 1; 1977, c. 551, ss. 1-4; 1979, c. 839, s. 1; 1981, c. 412, ss. 3, 4; c. 489, ss. 1-7; c. 747, s. 66; 1985, c. 97, s. 1; 1987, c. 154; 1991, c. 492, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 991, s. 1; 1993, c. 239, s. 1; 1995, c. 214, s. 1; 1999-237, s. 14.1; 2001-312, s. 3; 2001-515, s. 5; 2005-453, s. 15; 2009-21, s. 2; 2010-97, s. 9; 2015-221, s. 3.1; 2017-211, s. 14(a); 2019-166, s. 1; 2021-82, s. 5.

Cross References.

As to exemptions from the provisions of this section, see

G.S. 95-25.14

.

§ 95-25.6.
Wage payment.

Every employer shall pay every employee all wages and tips accruing to the employee on the regular payday. Pay periods may be daily, weekly, bi-weekly, semi-monthly, or monthly. Wages based upon bonuses, commissions, or other forms of calculation may be paid as infrequently as annually if prescribed in advance.

History.

1975, c. 413, s. 3; 1977, c. 826, s. 3; 1979, c. 839, s. 1.

§ 95-25.7.
Payment to separated employees.

Employees whose employment is discontinued for any reason shall be paid all wages due on or before the next regular payday either through the regular pay channels or by trackable mail if requested by the employee in writing. Wages based on bonuses, commissions or other forms of calculation shall be paid on the first regular payday after the amount becomes calculable when a separation occurs. Such wages may not be forfeited unless the employee has been notified in accordance with

G.S. 95-25.13

of the employer’s policy or practice which results in forfeiture. Employees not so notified are not subject to such loss or forfeiture.

History.

1975, c. 413, s. 4; 1979, c. 839, s. 1; 1981, c. 663, s. 1; 1993, c. 214, s. 1; 2021-82, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-82, s. 6, effective July 8, 2021, inserted “trackable” preceding “mail”, and substituted “employee in writing” for “employee” in the first sentence.

§ 95-25.7A.
Wages in dispute.

If the amount of wages is in dispute, the employer shall pay the wages, or that part of the wages, which the employer concedes to be due without condition, within the time set by this Article. The employee retains all remedies that the employee might otherwise be entitled to regarding any balance of wages claimed by the employee, including those remedies provided under this Article.

Acceptance of a partial payment of wages under this section by an employee does not constitute a release of the balance of the claim. Further, any release of the claim required by an employer as a condition of partial payment is void.

History.

1989, c. 687, s. 1.

§ 95-25.8.
Withholding of wages.

An employer may withhold or divert any portion of an employee’s wages when:

The employer is required or empowered to do so by State or federal law;

When the amount or rate of the proposed deduction is known and agreed upon in advance, the employer must have written authorization from the employee which (i) is signed on or before the payday(s) for the pay period(s) from which the deduction is to be made; (ii) indicates the reason for the deduction; and (iii) states the actual dollar amount or percentage of wages which shall be deducted from one or more paychecks. Provided, that if the deduction is for the convenience of the employee, the employee shall be given a reasonable opportunity to withdraw the authorization; or

When the amount of the proposed deduction is not known and agreed upon in advance, the employer must have written authorization from the employee which (i) is signed on or before the payday(s) for the pay period(s) from which the deduction is to be made; and (ii) indicates the reason for the deduction. Prior to any deductions being made under this section, the employee must (i) receive advance written notice of the actual amount to be deducted; (ii) receive written notice of their right to withdraw the authorization; and (iii) be given a reasonable opportunity to withdraw the authorization in writing.

The withholding or diversion of wages owed for the employer’s benefit must comply with the following requirements:

In nonovertime workweeks, an employer may reduce wages to the minimum wage level.

In overtime workweeks, employers may reduce wages to the minimum wage level for nonovertime hours.

No reductions may be made to overtime wages owed.

In addition to complying with the requirements in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, an employer may withhold or divert a portion of an employee’s wages for cash shortages, inventory shortages, or loss or damage to an employer’s property after giving the employee written notice of the amount to be deducted seven days prior to the payday on which the deduction is to be made, except that when a separation occurs the seven-day notice is not required.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), above, an overpayment of wages to an employee as a result of a miscalculation or other bona fide error, advances of wages to an employee or to a third party at the employee’s request, and the principal amount of loans made by an employer to an employee are considered prepayment of wages and may be withheld or deducted from an employee’s wages. Deductions for interest and other charges related to loans by an employer to an employee shall require written authorization in accordance with subsection (a), above.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (c), above, if criminal process has issued against an employee, an employee has been indicted, or an employee has been arrested pursuant to Articles 17, 20, and 32 of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes for a charge incident to a cash shortage, inventory shortage, or damage to an employer’s property, an employer may withhold or divert a portion of the employee’s wages in order to recoup the amount of the cash shortage, inventory shortage, or damage to the employer’s property, without the written authorization required by this section, but the amount of such withholdings shall comply with the provisions of subsection (b) of this section. If the employee is not found guilty, then the amount deducted shall be reimbursed to the employee by the employer.

For purposes of this section, a written authorization or written notice may be in the form of an electronic record in compliance with Article 40 of Chapter 66 (the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act).

Nothing in this Article shall preclude an employer from bringing a civil action in the General Court of Justice to collect any amounts due the employer from the employee.

History.

1975, c. 413, s. 6; 1979, c. 839, s. 1; 1981, c. 663, s. 2; 2005-453, s. 16.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-453, s. 16, effective October 1, 2005, rewrote this section, adding subsections (b) through (g).

§§ 95-25.9,
95-25.10.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-453, ss. 17 and 18, effective October 1, 2005.

§ 95-25.11.
Employers’ remedies preserved.

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-453, s. 19.

Nothing in this Article shall preclude an employer from bringing a civil action in the General Court of Justice to collect any amounts due the employer from the employee.

History.

1979, c. 839, s. 1; 1981, c. 663, s. 5; 2005-453, s. 19.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-453, s. 19, effective October 1, 2005, deleted former subsection (a) which read:

“(a) The provisions of

G.S. 95-25.8

, G.S. 95-25.9, and G.S. 95-25.10 do not apply if criminal process has issued against the employee, if the employee has been indicted, or if the employee has been arrested pursuant to Articles 17, 20, and 32 of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes for a charge incident to a cash shortage, inventory shortage, or damage to an employer’s property.

“If the employee is not found guilty, then the amount deducted shall be reimbursed to the employee by the employer.”

§ 95-25.12.
Vacation pay plans.

No employer is required to provide vacation pay plans for employees. However, if an employer provides these promised benefits for employees, the employer shall give all vacation time off or payment in lieu of time off in accordance with the company policy or practice. Employees shall be notified in accordance with

G.S. 95-25.13

of any policy or practice which requires or results in loss or forfeiture of vacation time or pay. Employees not so notified are not subject to such loss or forfeiture.

History.

1979, c. 839, s. 1; 1981, c. 663, s. 6; 2005-453, s. 20.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-453, s. 20, effective October 1, 2005, added “plans” to the end of the section heading; inserted “pay plans” preceding “for employees” in the first sentence; and substituted “these promised benefits” for “vacation” in the second sentence.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “North Carolina Employment Case Law: Contract Principles Abandoned,” 25 N.C. Cent. L.J. 163 (2003).

§ 95-25.13.
Notification, posting, and records.

Every employer shall do all of the following:

Notify its employees, in writing at the time of hiring, of the promised wages and the day and place for payment.

Make available to its employees, in writing or through a posted notice maintained in a place accessible to its employees, employment practices and policies with regard to promised wages.

Notify employees, in writing, at least one pay period prior to any changes in promised wages. Wages may be retroactively increased without the prior notice required by this subsection.

Furnish each employee with an itemized statement of deductions made from that employee’s wages under

G.S. 95-25.8

for each pay period such deductions are made.

History.

1975, c. 413, s. 7; 1979, c. 839, s. 1; 1981, c. 663, s. 12; 1993, c. 203, s. 1; 2005-453, s. 21; 2021-82, s. 7.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-453, s. 21, effective October 1, 2005, rewrote subdivision (3).

Session Laws 2021-82, s. 7, effective July 8, 2021, inserted “do all of the following” in the introductory paragraph; deleted “orally or” preceding “in writing” in subdivision (1); substituted “writing, at least one pay period” for “writing or through a posted notice maintained in a place accessible to its employees, at least 24 hours” in subdivision (3); and made stylistic changes throughout.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “North Carolina Employment Case Law: Contract Principles Abandoned,” 25 N.C. Cent. L.J. 163 (2003).

§ 95-25.14.
Exemptions.

The provisions of

G.S. 95-25.3

(Minimum Wage),

G.S. 95-25.4

(Overtime), and

G.S. 95-25.5

(Youth Employment), and the provisions of G.S. 95-25.15(b) (Record Keeping) as they relate to these exemptions, do not apply to:

Any person employed in an enterprise engaged in commerce or in the production of goods for commerce as defined in the Fair Labor Standards Act:

Except as otherwise specifically provided in

G.S. 95-25.5

;

Notwithstanding the above, any employee other than a learner, apprentice, student, or handicapped worker as defined in the Fair Labor Standards Act who is not otherwise exempt under the other provisions of this section, and for whom the applicable minimum wage under the Fair Labor Standards Act is less than the minimum wage provided in

G.S. 95-25.3

, is not exempt from the provisions of G.S. 95-25.3 or

G.S. 95-25.4

;

Notwithstanding the above, any employer or employee exempt from the minimum wage, overtime, or child labor requirements of the Fair Labor Standards Act for whom there is no comparable exemption under this Article shall not be exempt under this subsection except that where an exemption in the Fair Labor Standards Act provides a method of computing overtime which is an alternative to the method required in 29 U.S.C.S. § 207(a), the employer or employee subject to that alternate method shall be exempt from the provisions of

G.S. 95-25.4(a)

; provided that, persons not employed at an enterprise described in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall also be subject to the same alternative methods of overtime calculation in the circumstances described in the Fair Labor Standards Act exemptions providing those alternative methods;

Any person employed in agriculture, as defined under the Fair Labor Standards Act;

Any person employed as a domestic, including baby sitters and companions, as defined under the Fair Labor Standards Act;

Any person employed as a page in the North Carolina General Assembly or in the Governor’s Office;

Bona fide volunteers in medical, educational, religious, or nonprofit organizations where an employer-employee relationship does not exist;

Persons confined in and working for any penal, correctional or mental institution of the State or local government;

Any person employed as a model, or as an actor or performer in motion pictures or theatrical, radio or television productions, as defined under the Fair Labor Standards Act, except as otherwise specifically provided in G.S. 95-25.5;

Any person employed by an outdoor drama in a production role, including lighting, costumes, properties and special effects, except as otherwise specifically provided in G.S. 95-25.5; but this exemption does not include such positions as office workers, ticket takers, ushers and parking lot attendants.

The provisions of

G.S. 95-25.3

(Minimum Wage) and

G.S. 95-25.4

(Overtime), and the provisions of G.S. 95-25.15(b) (Record Keeping) as they relate to these exemptions, do not apply to:

Any employee of a boys’ or girls’ summer camp or of a seasonal religious or nonprofit educational conference center;

Any person employed in the catching, processing or first sale of seafood, as defined under the Fair Labor Standards Act;

The spouse, child, or parent of the employer or any person qualifying as a dependent of the employer under the income tax laws of North Carolina;

Any person employed in a bona fide executive, administrative, professional or outside sales capacity, as defined under the Fair Labor Standards Act;

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 687, s. 2.

Any person while participating in a ridesharing arrangement as defined in G.S. 136-44.21;

Any person who is employed as a computer systems analyst, computer programmer, software engineer, or other similarly skilled worker, as defined in the Fair Labor Standards Act.

(b1)

The provisions of

G.S. 95-25.3

(Minimum Wage) and

G.S. 95-25.4

(Overtime), and the provisions of G.S. 95- 25.15(b) (Record Keeping) as they relate to the exemptions provided for in this subsection, do not apply to any of the following:

(1)

Hours worked as a bona fide volunteer firefighter in an incorporated, nonprofit volunteer or community fire department.

(2)

Hours worked as a bona fide volunteer rescue and emergency medical services personnel in an incorporated, nonprofit volunteer or community fire department, or an incorporated, nonprofit rescue squad.Hours worked in accordance with this subsection shall not be considered hours worked for purposes of G.S. 95-25.3 or G.S. 95-25.4.

The provisions of G.S. 95-25.4 (Overtime), and the provisions of G.S. 95-25.15(b) (Record Keeping) as they relate to this exemption, do not apply to:

Drivers, drivers’ helpers, loaders and mechanics, as defined under the Fair Labor Standards Act;

Taxicab drivers;

Seamen, employees of railroads, and employees of air carriers, as defined under the Fair Labor Standards Act;

Salespersons, mechanics and partsmen employed by automotive, truck, and farm implement dealers, as defined under the Fair Labor Standards Act;

Salespersons employed by trailer, boat, and aircraft dealers, as defined under the Fair Labor Standards Act;

Live-in child care workers or other live-in employees in homes for dependent children;

Radio and television announcers, news editors, and chief engineers, as defined under the Fair Labor Standards Act.

Any employee of a seasonal amusement or recreational establishment.

The provisions of this Article do not apply to the State of North Carolina, any city, town, county, or municipality, or any State or local agency or instrumentality of government, except for the following provisions, which do apply:

The minimum wage provisions of

G.S. 95-25.3

;

The definition provisions of

G.S. 95-25.2

necessary to interpret the applicable provisions;

The exemptions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section;

The complainant protection provisions of

G.S. 95-25.2

0.

Employment in a seasonal recreation program by the State of North Carolina, any city, town, county, or municipality, or any State or local agency or instrumentality of government, is exempt from all provisions of this Article, including

G.S. 95-25.3

(Minimum Wage).

History.

1937, c. 406; c. 409, s. 3; 1939, c. 312, s. 1; 1943, c. 59; 1947, c. 825; 1949, c. 1057; 1959, cc. 475, 629; 1961, cc. 602, 1070; 1963, c. 1123; 1965, c. 724; 1967, c. 998; 1973, c. 600, s. 1; 1975, c. 19, s. 26; c. 413, s. 2; 1977, c. 146; 1979, c. 839, s. 1; 1981, c. 493, s. 2; c. 606, s. 2; c. 663, s. 7; 1983, c. 708, s. 2; 1989, c. 687, s. 2; 1991, c. 330, s. 3; 1993, c. 214, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 47; 1997-146, s. 2; 2002-113, s. 2; 2017-185, s. 3(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-185, s. 3(a), effective January 1, 2018, added subdivision (c)(8).

Legal Periodicals.

For 1997 legislative survey, see 20 Campbell L. Rev. 389 (1998).